Maryland, session 2026, HB0480.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
10–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
– 1 –

Ch. 232 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(l) “Transportation network company” means a company that operates in the
State using a digital network to connect passengers to transportation network operators or
transportation network partners for transportation network services.
(m) “Transportation network operator”, “transportation network partner”, or
“transportation network driver” means an individual who:
(1) has been issued a transportation network operator’s license, or is
otherwise authorized, by the Commission to provide transportation network services;
(2) receives, through a transportation network company’s digital network
application, a connection to a potential passenger to transport the passenger between
points chosen by the passenger in exchange for the payment of a fee to the transportation
network company; and
(3) uses a motor vehicle that is owned, leased, or otherwise authorized for
use by the individual and is approved for use in providing transportation network services
by the Commission.
(n) (1) “Transportation network services” means the activities of an operator
during:
(i) transportation network coverage period one, during which the
operator is logged onto and ready to accept a prearranged ride request made through a
transportation network company’s digital network application;
(ii) transportation network coverage period two, during which the
operator accepts a ride request from a passenger that is prearranged through a
transportation network company’s digital network application, and is traveling to a
predetermined location to pick up the passenger; and
(iii) transportation network coverage period three, during which the
operator transports the passenger and continuing until the passenger departs the motor
vehicle.
(2) “Transportation network services” does not include:
(i) providing taxicab services, sedan services, or limousine services;
(ii) any shared expense carpool arrangement or service or other type
of arrangement or service in which a driver receives a fee that does not exceed the driver’s
costs associated with providing a ride; or
(iii) transportation services that a nonprofit organization provides
through the use of a volunteer driver and the volunteer driver’s personal vehicle.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 232
10–401.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Operator” means a transportation network operator, transportation network
partner, or transportation network driver.
10–410.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “DEACTIVATE” OR “DEACTIVATION” MEANS AN
ACTION BY A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY TO PERMANENTLY CHANGE AN
OPERATOR’S ACCOUNT STATUS FROM ELIGIBLE TO PROVIDE TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK SERVICES TO INELIGIBLE TO PROVIDE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
SERVICES.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN OPERATOR’S LOSS OF ACCESS TO
A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY’S DIGITAL NETWORK APPLICATION IF THE
LOSS OF ACCESS:
(1) IS CONTINGENT ON AN OPERATOR’S COMPLIANCE WITH A
LICENSE, INSURANCE, OR A REGULATORY REQUIREMENT;
(2) WAS IMPLEMENTED BY THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
COMPANY FOR A LEGITIMATE FINANCIAL, BUSINESS, OR ECONOMIC REASON AND
NOT RELATED TO THE OPERATOR’S CONDUCT;
(3) IS ABLE TO BE RESOLVED THROUGH UNILATERAL ACTION BY THE
OPERATOR; OR
(4) IS THE RESULT OF ACCESS RESTRICTIONS DUE TO INCLEMENT
WEATHER OR NETWORK OUTAGES.
(C) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL:
(1) MAINTAIN A WRITTEN PLAIN–LANGUAGE DEACTIVATION POLICY
THAT PROVIDES FOR THE POLICIES AND PROCEDURES FOR THE DEACTIVATION OF
OPERATORS; AND
(2) MAKE THE DEACTIVATION POLICY AVAILABLE ONLINE THROUGH
THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY’S DIGITAL NETWORK APPLICATION.
(D) THE DEACTIVATION POLICY SHALL:
– 3 –

Ch. 232 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) STATE THAT THE DEACTIVATION POLICY IS ENFORCEABLE AS A
TERM OF THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY’S CONTRACT WITH THE
OPERATOR;
(2) DEFINE “SERIOUS MISCONDUCT” AND SPECIFY THAT SERIOUS
MISCONDUCT INCLUDES:
(I) REFUSAL TO PROVIDE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
SERVICES FOR ANY REASON RELATED TO A POTENTIAL PASSENGER’S DISABILITY,
INCLUDING THE USE OF A MOBILITY AID OR TRAVEL WITH A SERVICE ANIMAL; AND
(II) ANY OTHER CONDUCT THAT WOULD CONSTITUTE AN ACT OF
APPARENT DISCRIMINATION UNDER FEDERAL OR STATE LAW;
(3) INCLUDE A NONEXHAUSTIVE LIST OF EXAMPLES OF CONDUCT
THAT CONSTITUTES SERIOUS MISCONDUCT UNDER THE DEACTIVATION POLICY;
(4) PROVIDE THE OPERATOR WITH A REASONABLE UNDERSTANDING
OF WHAT MAY CONSTITUTE A VIOLATION THAT WARRANTS DEACTIVATION UNDER
THE DEACTIVATION POLICY;
(5) DESCRIBE THE PROCEDURES FOR NOTIFYING AN OPERATOR OF A
DEACTIVATION AND THE REASON FOR THE DEACTIVATION;
(6) DESCRIBE THE PROCEDURES AND ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA FOR THE
RECONSIDERATION OF A DEACTIVATION DECISION AND THE PROCESS, CONSISTENT
WITH SUBSECTION (I) OF THIS SECTION, FOR AN OPERATOR TO REQUEST A
DEACTIVATION APPEAL WITH THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY; AND
(7) BE SPECIFIC ENOUGH FOR AN OPERATOR TO UNDERSTAND WHAT
CONSTITUTES A VIOLATION OF THE POLICY AND HOW TO AVOID VIOLATING THE
POLICY.
(E) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY MAY NOT DEACTIVATE AN
OPERATOR FOR A VIOLATION NOT REASONABLY UNDERSTOOD TO BE PART OF THE
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY’S DEACTIVATION POLICY.
(F) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY MAY NOT RELY SOLELY ON A PASSENGER
REPORT AS THE BASIS FOR A DEACTIVATION.
(2) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY MAY RELY SOLELY ON A
PASSENGER REPORT AS THE BASIS FOR A DEACTIVATION IF:
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 232
(I) THE REPORT WAS SUBMITTED WITHIN 14 DAYS AFTER THE
DATE OF THE ALLEGED INCIDENT; OR
(II) 1. THE REPORT INVOLVES AN ALLEGED VIOLATION OF A
FEDERAL OR STATE LAW;
2. THE REPORT INVOLVES AN ALLEGED VIOLATION OF
THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY’S NONDISCRIMINATION POLICY;
3. THE REPORT INVOLVES AN ALLEGED ACT OF FRAUD
UNDER TITLE 8 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE, AS DEFINED IN THE
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY’S CONTRACT WITH THE OPERATOR, OR IN
THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY’S TERMS, INCLUDING:
A. DELIBERATELY INCREASING THE TIME OR DISTANCE
OF A PASSENGER TRIP OR ACCEPTING A PASSENGER TRIP WITHOUT THE INTENTION
OF COMPLETING THE TRIP;
B. USING ANOTHER OPERATOR’S ACCOUNT OR
CREATING A FAKE OR DUPLICATE ACCOUNT ON A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
COMPANY’S DIGITAL NETWORK APPLICATION;
C. INTENTIONALLY REQUESTING OR ACCEPTING
FRAUDULENT OR FALSIFIED PASSENGER TRIPS; OR
D. INTENTIONALLY DISRUPTING OR MANIPULATING THE
NORMAL FUNCTIONING OF A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY’S DIGITAL
NETWORK APPLICATION, INCLUDING MANIPULATING THE SETTINGS ON A PHONE TO
PREVENT THE PROPER FUNCTIONING OF A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY’S
DIGITAL NETWORK APPLICATION; OR
4. THE REPORT INVOLVES OPERATOR, ROAD, OR
PERSONAL SAFETY.
(G) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL ALLOW AN OPERATOR
WHOSE ACCOUNT IS DEACTIVATED TO WITHDRAW EARNINGS THAT ACCRUED
BEFORE THE DEACTIVATION UNLESS:
(1) THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY REASONABLY
BELIEVES THAT A PORTION OF THE EARNINGS ARE CONNECTED TO CRIMINAL OR
FRAUDULENT CONDUCT; OR
(2) THE WITHDRAWAL WOULD VIOLATE A FEDERAL OR STATE LAW.
– 5 –

Ch. 232 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(H) (1) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL PROVIDE AN
OPERATOR WITH WRITTEN NOTICE OF A DEACTIVATION:
(I) ON THE DATE THE DEACTIVATION BECOMES EFFECTIVE; OR
(II) FOR SERIOUS MISCONDUCT, WITHIN 3 DAYS AFTER THE
DEACTIVATION.
(2) A WRITTEN NOTICE OF DEACTIVATION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE REASON FOR THE DEACTIVATION;
(II) INFORMATION ON AN OPERATOR’S RIGHT TO APPEAL THE
DEACTIVATION; AND
(III) INSTRUCTIONS FOR AN OPERATOR TO APPEAL THE
DEACTIVATION.
(I) (1) A DEACTIVATION POLICY SHALL INCLUDE AN APPEALS PROCESS
FOR AN OPERATOR TO APPEAL A DEACTIVATION.
(2) AN OPERATOR WHO IS DEACTIVATED BY A TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK COMPANY HAS THE RIGHT TO APPEAL THE DEACTIVATION BEGINNING ON
THE DATE THE OPERATOR RECEIVES NOTICE OF THE DEACTIVATION.
(3) AN APPEALS PROCESS SHALL PROVIDE AN OPERATOR WITH:
(I) AT LEAST 30 DAYS FROM THE DATE OF THE NOTICE OF
DEACTIVATION TO APPEAL THE DEACTIVATION; AND
(II) AN OPPORTUNITY TO PROVIDE THE TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK COMPANY OR THIRD PARTY, AS APPROPRIATE, WITH INFORMATION TO
SUPPORT THE APPEAL.
(4) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, A
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL REVIEW AND MAKE A FINAL
DECISION ON AN APPEAL OF A DEACTIVATION WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF
THE APPEAL AND ANY INFORMATION THE OPERATOR PROVIDES TO SUPPORT THE
APPEAL.
(II) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY OR AN OPERATOR
MAY REQUEST AN ADDITIONAL 15 DAYS TO REVIEW AND MAKE A FINAL DECISION ON
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 232
AN APPEAL OF DEACTIVATION OR PROVIDE INFORMATION TO SUPPORT THE
APPEAL, AS APPROPRIATE.
(5) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY MAY USE A THIRD
PARTY TO ASSIST IN THE APPEALS PROCESS.
(6) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL CONSIDER ALL
INFORMATION PROVIDED BY THE OPERATOR DURING THE APPEALS PROCESS.
(7) FOR AN APPEALED DEACTIVATION TO BE UPHELD UNDER THE
APPEALS PROCESS A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY OR A THIRD PARTY
MUST DETERMINE THAT UNDER THE TOTALITY OF THE CIRCUMSTANCES THERE IS
EVIDENCE TO FIND THAT IT IS MORE LIKELY THAN NOT THAT A VIOLATION OF THE
DEACTIVATION POLICY HAS OCCURRED.
(l) “Transportation network company” means [a company that operates in the
State using a digital network to connect passengers to transportation network operators or
transportation network partners for transportation network services] AN ORGANIZATION,
INCLUDING A CORPORATION, PARTNERSHIP, OR SOLE PROPRIETOR, THAT USES AN
ONLINE–ENABLED APPLICATION, PLATFORM, OR DIGITAL DISPATCH SYSTEM TO:
(1) CONNECT PASSENGERS AND CUSTOMERS WITH TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK DRIVERS;
(2) PRESENT OFFERS TO TRANSPORTATION NETWORK DRIVERS
THROUGH A DIGITAL LABOR PLATFORM; OR
(3) FACILITATE THE PROVISION OF TRANSPORTATION SERVICES FOR
COMPENSATION BY TRANSPORTATION NETWORK DRIVERS.
(m) “Transportation network operator”, “transportation network partner”, or
“transportation network driver” means an individual who:
(1) has been issued a transportation network operator’s license, or is
otherwise authorized, by the Commission to provide transportation network services;
(2) [receives, through a transportation network company’s digital network
application, a connection to a potential passenger to transport the passenger between
points chosen by the passenger in exchange for the payment of a fee to the transportation
network company] PROVIDES TRANSPORTATION TO PASSENGERS OR CUSTOMERS:
(I) THROUGH A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY’S
PLATFORM; AND
– 7 –

Ch. 232 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) BETWEEN POINTS CHOSEN BY THE PASSENGER OR
CUSTOMER IN EXCHANGE FOR PAYMENT:
1. OF A FEE TO THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
COMPANY; AND
2. FOR THE OPERATOR’S SERVICE MADE THROUGH OR
BY THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY; and
(3) uses a motor vehicle that is owned, leased, or otherwise authorized for
use by the individual and is approved BY THE COMMISSION AND THE TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK COMPANY for use in providing transportation network services [by the
Commission].
10–401.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) (1) “EGREGIOUS MISCONDUCT” MEANS AN ACTION OR A BEHAVIOR
BY AN OPERATOR THAT:
(I) POSES AN IMMEDIATE THREAT TO THE PHYSICAL SAFETY OF
A PASSENGER OR CUSTOMER, ANOTHER PERSON, OR AN ANIMAL; OR
(II) INTENTIONALLY CAUSES IMMEDIATE AND IRREPARABLE
ECONOMIC HARM TO A PASSENGER OR CUSTOMER, ANOTHER PERSON, OR THE
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY.
(2) “EGREGIOUS MISCONDUCT” INCLUDES:
(I) 1. THREE OR MORE NONCRIMINAL MOVING VIOLATIONS
WITHIN A 3–YEAR PERIOD; OR
2. THREE OR MORE AT–FAULT TRAFFIC COLLISIONS IN A
3–YEAR PERIOD; AND
(II) ANY CONDUCT THAT THE COMMISSION DEFINES BY
REGULATION AS EGREGIOUS MISCONDUCT.
(3) “EGREGIOUS MISCONDUCT”, EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, DOES NOT INCLUDE CONDUCT RELATED TO
NONCRIMINAL MOVING VIOLATIONS OR TRAFFIC COLLISIONS.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 232
(C) “Insurance Commissioner” means the Insurance Commissioner of the
Maryland Insurance Administration.
(D) “MOVING VIOLATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–136.1 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
[(c)] (E) “Operator” means a transportation network operator, transportation
network partner, or transportation network driver.
(F) “OPERATOR ADVOCACY ORGANIZATION” MEANS A
MEMBERSHIP–BASED, MEMBER–LED NONPROFIT OR LABOR ORGANIZATION THAT:
(1) HAS OPERATED IN THE STATE FOR AT LEAST 2 YEARS WITH THE
PRINCIPAL PURPOSE OF SUPPORTING OPERATORS;
(2) HAS NOT PREVIOUSLY AND DOES NOT CURRENTLY RECEIVE
FUNDING, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, FROM A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
COMPANY;
(3) IS NOT EXCESSIVELY INFLUENCED OR CONTROLLED BY A
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY; AND
(4) HAS NOT PREVIOUSLY AND IS NOT CURRENTLY AFFILIATED WITH
ANY OTHER ENTITY:
(I) THAT RECEIVES FUNDING, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY,
FROM ANY ENTITY CONTROLLED BY A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY; OR
(II) THAT IS, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, EXCESSIVELY
INFLUENCED OR CONTROLLED BY A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY.
10–410.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “DEACTIVATE” OR “DEACTIVATION” MEANS AN
ACTION BY A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY THAT RESTRICTS AN
OPERATOR’S ACCESS TO THE COMPANY’S DIGITAL NETWORK FOR 48 HOURS OR
MORE.
(2) “DEACTIVATE” OR “DEACTIVATION” INCLUDES:
(I) BLOCKING AN OPERATOR’S ACCESS TO A DIGITAL
NETWORK;
– 9 –

Ch. 232 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) SUSPENDING AN OPERATOR; AND
(III) CHANGING AN OPERATOR’S STATUS FROM ELIGIBLE TO
INELIGIBLE TO PROVIDE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK SERVICES FOR 48 HOURS OR
MORE.
(B) (1) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL:
(I) MAINTAIN A WRITTEN POLICY THAT PROVIDES THE
POLICIES AND PROCEDURES FOR THE DEACTIVATION OF OPERATORS; AND
(II) MAKE THE DEACTIVATION POLICY AVAILABLE:
1. ON THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY’S
WEBSITE AND THROUGH THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY’S DIGITAL
NETWORK APPLICATION;
2. IN ENGLISH AND OTHER LANGUAGES THE
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY KNOWS OR HAS REASON TO KNOW ARE
SPOKEN BY THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY’S OPERATORS; AND
3. FOR AT LEAST 3 YEARS AFTER THE LAST DAY THAT
THE POLICY IS IN EFFECT.
(2) ANY UPDATE OR CHANGE TO THE DEACTIVATION POLICY SHALL
BE PROVIDED TO THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY’S OPERATORS AT
LEAST 72 HOURS BEFORE THE UPDATE OR CHANGE TAKES EFFECT.
(C) (1) THE DEACTIVATION POLICY SHALL BE SPECIFIC ENOUGH FOR AN
OPERATOR TO UNDERSTAND WHAT CONSTITUTES A VIOLATION OF THE POLICY AND
HOW TO AVOID VIOLATING THE POLICY.
(2) (I) THE DEACTIVATION POLICY SHALL BE REASONABLY
RELATED TO THE SAFE AND EFFICIENT OPERATION OF THE TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK COMPANY.
(II) THE DEACTIVATION POLICY MAY NOT INCLUDE A POLICY
THAT WOULD RESULT IN A DEACTIVATION BASED ON:
1. AN OPERATOR’S AVAILABILITY TO WORK, INCLUDING
THE NUMBER OF HOURS THE OPERATOR IS AVAILABLE TO WORK;
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 232
2. AN OPERATOR’S ACCEPTANCE OR REJECTION OF ANY
INDIVIDUAL OFFER, ANY TYPES OF OFFERS, OR ANY NUMBER OR PROPORTION OF
OFFERS;
3. AN OPERATOR’S CANCELLATION OF AN OFFER WITH
CAUSE;
4. AN OPERATOR CONTACTING THE TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK COMPANY;
5. STATEMENTS BY AN OPERATOR REGARDING THE
TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF THE WORK THAT ARE MADE TO CUSTOMERS, OTHER
OPERATORS, OTHER TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANIES, THE MEDIA, PUBLIC
OFFICIALS, OR THE GENERAL PUBLIC;
6. A QUANTITATIVE METRIC DERIVED FROM
AGGREGATE CUSTOMER RATINGS OF AN OPERATOR’S PERFORMANCE;
7. AN OPERATOR ASSERTING THE OPERATOR’S LEGAL
RIGHTS, WHETHER IN COURT OR THROUGH PROCEDURES PROVIDED BY ANY LOCAL,
STATE, OR FEDERAL AGENCY; OR
8. EXCEPT IN THE CASE OF EGREGIOUS MISCONDUCT OR
WHERE DEACTIVATION IS OTHERWISE REQUIRED BY LAW, THE RESULTS OF A
BACKGROUND CHECK, CONSUMER REPORT, DRIVING RECORD, OR RECORD OF
TRAFFIC VIOLATIONS.
(3) THE COMMISSION MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS:
(I) ESTABLISHING THE FORM AND DESCRIPTION OF THE
DEACTIVATION POLICY, THE MANNER IN WHICH THE DEACTIVATION POLICY IS
DISTRIBUTED, AND THE LANGUAGES THE DEACTIVATION POLICY MUST BE
PROVIDED IN; AND
(II) DEFINING REASONABLENESS OF A DEACTIVATION POLICY.
(D) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTIONS (F) AND (G) OF THIS
SECTION, BEFORE DEACTIVATING AN OPERATOR, A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
COMPANY SHALL:
(I) CONDUCT A FAIR AND OBJECTIVE INVESTIGATION; AND
– 11 –

Ch. 232 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) DEMONSTRATE BY A PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE
THAT THE ALLEGED VIOLATION OF THE DEACTIVATION POLICY OCCURRED.
(2) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY MAY NOT DEACTIVATE
AN OPERATOR UNLESS THE INVESTIGATION IS THOROUGH ENOUGH TO JUSTIFY THE
DEACTIVATION.
(3) IF AN OPERATOR DOES NOT PARTICIPATE IN AN INVESTIGATION
CONDUCTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION OR PROVIDE RELEVANT INFORMATION, A
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY MAY COMPLETE THE INVESTIGATION BASED
ON AVAILABLE SOURCES OF INFORMATION.
(E) (1) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY MAY NOT DEACTIVATE
AN OPERATOR:
(I) FOR AN UNWARRANTED REASON OR A REASON THAT IS
INCONSISTENT WITH THE COMPANY’S DEACTIVATION POLICY; OR
(II) IF THE DEACTIVATION IS INTENDED TO OR RESULTS IN
DISCRIMINATION OR A DISCRIMINATORY ACT.
(2) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL APPLY THE
DEACTIVATION POLICY AND PENALTIES FOR VIOLATING THE POLICY IN A
CONSISTENT MANNER.
(3) THE PENALTY OF DEACTIVATION MUST:
(I) BE REASONABLY RELATED TO A VIOLATION OF THE
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY’S DEACTIVATION POLICY; AND
(II) TAKE INTO ACCOUNT MITIGATING CIRCUMSTANCES,
INCLUDING THE OPERATOR’S PAST WORK HISTORY WITH THE TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK COMPANY.
(F) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY MAY IMMEDIATELY
DEACTIVATE AN OPERATOR IF:
(1) THE DEACTIVATION IS REQUIRED TO COMPLY WITH ANY
APPLICABLE COURT ORDER OR LOCAL, STATE, OR FEDERAL LAW OR REGULATION;
OR
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 232
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION, THE OPERATOR
HAS CLEARLY ENGAGED IN EGREGIOUS MISCONDUCT.
(G) (1) IF AN OPERATOR IS ALLEGED TO HAVE ENGAGED IN EGREGIOUS
MISCONDUCT, THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY MAY DEACTIVATE THE
OPERATOR BEFORE COMPLETING AN INVESTIGATION UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF
THIS SECTION.
(2) (I) EXCEPT FOR EXTRAORDINARY CIRCUMSTANCES, THE
INVESTIGATION OF EGREGIOUS MISCONDUCT MAY NOT EXCEED 14 DAYS.
(II) IF THE INVESTIGATION IS DELAYED DUE TO
EXTRAORDINARY CIRCUMSTANCES, THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY
SHALL PROVIDE THE OPERATOR WITH WRITTEN NOTICE THAT THE INVESTIGATION
IS DELAYED, THE REASON FOR THE DELAY, AND THE DATE ON WHICH THE
COMPLETION OF THE INVESTIGATION IS ANTICIPATED.
(H) (1) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL PROVIDE AN
OPERATOR WITH NOTICE OF A DEACTIVATION AT LEAST 14 DAYS BEFORE THE
DEACTIVATION AND ON THE DATE THE DEACTIVATION BECOMES EFFECTIVE.
(II) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL PROVIDE
AN OPERATOR WHO IS DEACTIVATED FOR EGREGIOUS MISCONDUCT THE NOTICE OF
DEACTIVATION ON OR BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE DEACTIVATION.
(2) (I) THE COMMISSION SHALL DESIGNATE THE FORM AND
MANNER OF DELIVERY OF THE NOTICE OF DEACTIVATION.
(II) THE COMMISSION MAY CREATE AND DISTRIBUTE A MODEL
NOTICE OF DEACTIVATION IN ENGLISH AND OTHER LANGUAGES THE COMMISSION
DETERMINES ARE APPROPRIATE.
(3) THE NOTICE OF DEACTIVATION SHALL INCLUDE A WRITTEN
STATEMENT OF:
(I) THE REASON FOR THE DEACTIVATION, INCLUDING:
1. THE BEHAVIOR THAT VIOLATED THE
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY’S DEACTIVATION POLICY; AND
– 13 –

Ch. 232 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. THE SPECIFIC INCIDENT OR PATTERN OF INCIDENTS
THAT VIOLATED THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY’S DEACTIVATION
POLICY;
(II) THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE DEACTIVATION;
(III) RECORDS OR OTHER EVIDENCE RELIED ON DURING THE
INVESTIGATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION TO CONFIRM
OR SUBSTANTIATE A VIOLATION OF THE DEACTIVATION POLICY;
(IV) THE LENGTH OF THE DEACTIVATION;
(V) THE STEPS THE OPERATOR CAN TAKE TO REMEDY THE
DEACTIVATION;
(VI) THE OPERATOR’S RIGHT TO APPEAL THE DEACTIVATION;
(VII) THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY’S PROCESS
FOR APPEALING DEACTIVATION UNDER SUBSECTION (J) OF THIS SECTION,
INCLUDING THE METHODS AVAILABLE FOR AN OPERATOR TO INITIATE AN APPEAL;
(VIII) THE CONTACT INFORMATION FOR AN OPERATOR ADVOCACY
ORGANIZATION OR OTHER ENTITY THAT MAY BE ABLE TO ASSIST THE OPERATOR;
AND
(IX) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE COMMISSION
REQUIRES.
(I) (1) UNLESS OTHERWISE PROVIDED BY LOCAL, STATE, OR FEDERAL
LAW, A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY THAT ISSUES A NOTICE OF
DEACTIVATION TO AN OPERATOR SHALL PROVIDE THE OPERATOR WITH THE
RECORDS RELIED ON BY THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY TO CONFIRM
OR SUBSTANTIATE A VIOLATION OF THE DEACTIVATION POLICY.
(2) THE RECORDS REQUIRED TO BE PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION INCLUDE:
(I) THE DATE, TIME, AND LOCATION OF ANY INCIDENT
SUPPORTING THE DEACTIVATION DECISION;
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 232
(II) A COPY OF THE EVIDENCE THAT THE TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK COMPANY CONSIDERED DURING THE DEACTIVATION INVESTIGATION;
AND
(III) A CERTIFIED STATEMENT FROM AN INDIVIDUAL AT THE
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY WITH AUTHORITY TO REINSTATE THE
OPERATOR ATTESTING THAT THE RECORDS ARE TRUE AND ACCURATE.
(3) IF THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY TAKES
POSSESSION OR HAS KNOWLEDGE OF ADDITIONAL RECORDS THAT SUBSTANTIATE
THE DEACTIVATION, THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL PROVIDE
OR NOTIFY THE OPERATOR OF THE RECORDS AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE AND NOT
LATER THAN 14 DAYS AFTER THE DATE THAT THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
COMPANY TAKES POSSESSION OR HAS KNOWLEDGE OF THE RECORDS.
(4) (I) IF THE RECORDS SUBSTANTIATING A DEACTIVATION
CONTAIN INFORMATION RELATED TO THE IDENTITY OF A PASSENGER, CUSTOMER,
OR OTHER PARTY AND THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY REASONABLY
BELIEVES THAT THE INFORMATION COULD COMPROMISE THE PASSENGER,
CUSTOMER, OR OTHER PARTY’S SAFETY, THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
COMPANY MAY REDACT THE INFORMATION THAT IS RELATED TO OR COULD
REASONABLY INFORM THE OPERATOR OF THE IDENTITY OF THE PASSENGER,
CUSTOMER, OR OTHER PARTY.
(II) IF A COMPLAINT FROM A PASSENGER, CUSTOMER, OR
OTHER PARTY IS THE SOLE BASIS FOR A DEACTIVATION, THE TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK COMPANY MAY PROVIDE A SUMMARY DESCRIPTION OF THE RECORDS
SUBSTANTIATING THE DEACTIVATION.
(III) THE COMMISSION MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS REGARDING
MEASURES A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY MAY TAKE TO SUMMARIZE THE
RECORDS SUBSTANTIATING A DEACTIVATION OR REDACT INFORMATION RELATED
TO THE IDENTITY OF A PASSENGER, CUSTOMER, OR OTHER PARTY.
(5) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL RETAIN THE
RECORDS REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION FOR 3 YEARS AFTER THE DATE OF
THE DEACTIVATION OF AN OPERATOR.
(6) IF A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY FAILS TO DISCLOSE
ANY RECORDS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION, THERE IS A PRESUMPTION,
REBUTTABLE BY CLEAR AND CONVINCING EVIDENCE, THAT THE TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK COMPANY VIOLATED THIS SUBSECTION.
– 15 –

Ch. 232 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(J) (1) (I) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL
ESTABLISH AN INTERNAL PROCEDURE FOR AN OPERATOR TO APPEAL A
DEACTIVATION.
(II) AN OPERATOR WHO IS DEACTIVATED BY A
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY HAS THE RIGHT TO APPEAL THE
DEACTIVATION THROUGH THE COMPANY’S INTERNAL PROCEDURE.
(III) AN OPERATOR SHALL HAVE 90 DAYS TO APPEAL A
DEACTIVATION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION BEGINNING ON THE DATE THE OPERATOR
RECEIVES A NOTICE OF THE DEACTIVATION.
(IV) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL MAKE
AVAILABLE TO A DEACTIVATED OPERATOR INFORMATION REGARDING THE
INTERNAL DEACTIVATION APPEAL PROCEDURE:
1. IN WRITING, IN A FORMAT THAT IS READILY
ACCESSIBLE TO THE OPERATOR, AND IN ENGLISH AND ANY LANGUAGE THAT THE
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY KNOWS OR HAS REASON TO KNOW IS THE
PRIMARY LANGUAGE OF THE OPERATOR; AND
2. FOR AT LEAST 3 YEARS AFTER THE DEACTIVATION.
(V) 1. A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL
ESTABLISH A SYSTEM ACCESSIBLE TO OPERATORS THAT INFORMS OPERATORS OF
THEIR ELIGIBILITY TO APPEAL A DEACTIVATION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
2. THE SYSTEM SHALL BE AVAILABLE TO THE OPERATOR
THROUGH A SMARTPHONE APPLICATION AND ON THE COMPANY’S INTERNET WEB
PORTAL FOR AT LEAST 3 YEARS AFTER THE DEACTIVATION.
(VI) THE COMMISSION MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS SPECIFYING:
1. THE FORM AND CONTENT OF THE DESCRIPTION OF
THE INTERNAL DEACTIVATION APPEAL PROCEDURE;
2. THE MANNER OF DISTRIBUTING INFORMATION
REGARDING THE PROCEDURE; AND
3. THE LANGUAGES INTO WHICH THE PROCEDURE MUST
BE TRANSLATED.
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 232
(2) (I) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL REVIEW
AND RESPOND TO AN OPERATOR’S APPEAL OF DEACTIVATION WITHIN 14 DAYS
AFTER RECEIVING NOTICE OF THE APPEAL.
(II) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY’S RESPONSE TO
AN OPERATOR’S APPEAL OF DEACTIVATION SHALL INCLUDE A WRITTEN
STATEMENT, CERTIFIED BY AN INDIVIDUAL AT THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
COMPANY WITH AUTHORITY TO REINSTATE THE OPERATOR, OF:
1. THE EVIDENCE THAT SUBSTANTIATES THE
DEACTIVATION CONSIDERED DURING THE INVESTIGATION REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (D) OR (G) OF THIS SECTION AND SUBSTANTIVE RESPONSES TO
QUESTIONS OR CLAIMS MADE BY THE OPERATOR IN THE APPEAL OF DEACTIVATION;
2. A DESCRIPTION OF THE EXTRAORDINARY
CIRCUMSTANCES NECESSITATING A DELAYED TIMELINE FOR A RESPONSE, AND AN
ANTICIPATED DATE FOR A RESPONSE THAT SUBSTANTIATES THE DEACTIVATION OR
REINSTATES THE OPERATOR; OR
3. A DETERMINATION THAT THE OPERATOR DID NOT
VIOLATE THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY’S DEACTIVATION POLICY AND
THE DATE THAT THE OPERATOR WILL BE REINSTATED.
(3) AN OPERATOR MAY FILE A COMPLAINT WITH THE COMMISSION OR
BRING A CIVIL ACTION FOR A VIOLATION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) ON RECEIPT OF THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
COMPANY’S INITIAL RESPONSE TO THE INTERNAL APPEAL; OR
(II) WITHIN 14 DAYS AFTER AN OPERATOR INITIATES AN
INTERNAL APPEAL.
(4) AN OPERATOR MAY APPEAL THE DEACTIVATION AND PURSUE ALL
AVENUES OF RELIEF AVAILABLE REGARDLESS OF THE GEOGRAPHIC LOCATION OF
THE INCIDENT THAT LEADS TO THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY’S
DECISION TO DEACTIVATE THE OPERATOR.
(K) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS REQUIRING A
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY TO TRANSMIT TO THE COMMISSION
INFORMATION AND RECORDS ON THE DEACTIVATION OF OPERATORS:
(I) ON AT LEAST A QUARTERLY BASIS ON OR BEFORE JULY 1,
2028; AND
– 17 –

Ch. 232 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) AT LEAST ONCE EVERY 6 MONTHS AFTER JUNE 30, 2028.
(2) THE INFORMATION AND RECORDS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY INCLUDE:
(I) A COPY OF THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY’S
DEACTIVATION POLICY;
(II) A COPY OF THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY’S
DEACTIVATION APPEAL PROCEDURE, INCLUDING THE AVAILABLE METHODS OF
CONTACT FOR AN OPERATOR TO INITIATE AN APPEAL;
(III) INFORMATION AND RECORDS REGARDING THE NUMBER OF
DEACTIVATIONS INITIATED BY A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY;
(IV) INFORMATION AND RECORDS REGARDING THE
DEACTIVATION POLICY VIOLATION THAT MOST COMMONLY RESULTS IN THE
DEACTIVATION OF AN OPERATOR;
(V) THE NUMBER OF OPERATORS THAT APPEAL A
DEACTIVATION DECISION AND THE PROCESS THAT EACH OPERATOR USES TO
APPEAL THE DEACTIVATION;
(VI) THE NUMBER OF OPERATORS REINSTATED AFTER A
DEACTIVATION DECISION, INCLUDING THE LENGTH OF EACH DEACTIVATION
BEFORE REINSTATEMENT, AND THE LENGTH OF SERVICE WITH THE
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY OF AN OPERATOR BEFORE A DEACTIVATION
DECISION; AND
(VII) ANY OTHER INFORMATION OR RECORD THE COMMISSION
DETERMINES IS NECESSARY FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(3) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS PROVIDING FOR
THE FORMAT, SECURITY, AND PRIVACY OF THE RECORDS REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION.
(L) (1) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL PROVIDE EACH
OF THE COMPANY’S OPERATORS WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE RIGHTS ESTABLISHED
UNDER THIS SECTION WITHIN 24 HOURS OF THE OPERATOR PROVIDING
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK SERVICE FOR THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
COMPANY.
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 232
(2) (I) AT LEAST ONCE A YEAR, A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
COMPANY SHALL PROVIDE EACH OF THE COMPANY’S OPERATORS NOTICE OF THE
OPERATORS’ RIGHTS UNDER THIS SECTION.
(II) THE NOTICE OF RIGHTS REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH
(I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL INCLUDE INFORMATION ON:
1. THE RIGHT TO APPEAL A DEACTIVATION THROUGH A
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY’S INTERNAL DEACTIVATION APPEAL
PROCEDURE AND ANY OTHER PROCEDURE AVAILABLE TO APPEAL THE
DEACTIVATION;
2. THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY’S
INTERNAL DEACTIVATION APPEAL PROCEDURE;
3. THE OPERATOR’S RIGHT, EXCEPT IN THE CASE OF
EGREGIOUS MISCONDUCT, TO AT LEAST 14 DAYS’ NOTICE OF DEACTIVATION;
4. THE OPERATOR’S RIGHT TO ACCESS THE RECORDS
RELIED ON BY THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY TO CONFIRM OR
SUBSTANTIATE THE DEACTIVATION;
5. THE OPERATOR’S RIGHT TO BE PROTECTED FROM
RETALIATION BY A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY FOR THE GOOD FAITH
EXERCISE OF THE RIGHTS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
6. THE RIGHT TO FILE A COMPLAINT WITH THE
COMMISSION OR BRING A CIVIL ACTION FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(3) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE THE NOTICE OF RIGHTS IN:
1. AN ELECTRONIC FORMAT THAT IS READILY
ACCESSIBLE BY THE COMPANY’S OPERATORS; AND
2. ENGLISH AND ANY LANGUAGE THE TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK COMPANY KNOWS OR HAS REASON TO KNOW IS THE PRIMARY LANGUAGE
OF THE OPERATOR; AND
– 19 –

Ch. 232 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) MAKE THE NOTICE OF RIGHTS AVAILABLE TO THE
OPERATOR THROUGH THE OPERATOR’S SMARTPHONE OR E–MAIL OR ON THE
COMPANY’S INTERNET WEB PORTAL.
(4) (I) THE COMMISSION MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS PROVIDING
FOR THE FORM AND CONTENT, METHOD OF DISTRIBUTION, AND REQUIRED
LANGUAGES FOR THE NOTICE OF RIGHTS REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) THE COMMISSION MAY CREATE AND DISTRIBUTE A MODEL
NOTICE OF RIGHTS REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IN ENGLISH AND ANY
OTHER LANGUAGE THE COMMISSION DETERMINES IS APPROPRIATE.
(M) (1) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL RETAIN:
(I) RECORDS THAT DOCUMENT COMPLIANCE WITH THIS
SECTION FOR EACH OF THE COMPANY’S OPERATORS; AND
(II) A COMPLIANCE FILE FOR EACH DEACTIVATION FOR A
PERIOD OF 3 YEARS AFTER THE DEACTIVATION.
(2) THE COMPLIANCE FILE FOR EACH DEACTIVATION MAY INCLUDE:
(I) THE DEACTIVATION NOTICE PROVIDED TO THE OPERATOR;
(II) THE DATE OF COMPLETION FOR AN INVESTIGATION OF THE
CONDUCT THAT RESULTED IN THE DEACTIVATION;
(III) IF THE DEACTIVATION WAS THE RESULT OF EGREGIOUS
MISCONDUCT, A DESCRIPTION OF THE EGREGIOUS MISCONDUCT;
(IV) IF THE INVESTIGATION WAS DELAYED BY EXTRAORDINARY
CIRCUMSTANCES, THE EXTRAORDINARY CIRCUMSTANCES THAT RESULTED IN THE
DELAY;
(V) THE NUMBER OF RIDES COMPLETED BY THE OPERATOR IN
THE 180 DAYS BEFORE THE DEACTIVATION NOTICE, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE
RIDES WERE COMPLETED IN THE STATE OR OUTSIDE THE STATE;
(VI) IF THE DEACTIVATION WAS APPEALED, THE DATE THE
APPEAL WAS INITIATED AND COMPLETED; AND
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 232
(VII) IF THE DEACTIVATION WAS APPEALED, THE COMPANY’S
RESPONSE TO THE OPERATOR REGARDING THE APPEAL.
(3) IF A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY DOES NOT RETAIN
THE RECORDS REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THERE IS A PRESUMPTION,
REBUTTABLE BY CLEAR AND CONVINCING EVIDENCE, THAT THE COMPANY
VIOLATED THIS SUBSECTION FOR THE RELEVANT PERIODS AND FOR EACH
OPERATOR FOR WHOM THE RECORDS WERE NOT RETAINED.
(4) THE COMMISSION MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS PROVIDING FOR
THE FORMAT AND CONTENT OF THE RECORDS REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before November 1,
2026, a transportation network company shall provide each of the company’s operators with
notice of the operator’s rights required under § 10–410(l) of the Public Utilities Article, as
enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
SECTION 3. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026 January 1, 2027.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 21 –